Missouri, session 2026, SB847.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 313.205 and 313.230, RSMo, are
repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 313.205 and 313.230, to read as follows:
313.205. As used in sections 313.200 to 313.350, the
following words and terms shall have the meanings ascribed
to them in this section unless the context clearly requires
otherwise:
(1) "Commission" or "lottery commission", the three-
member body appointed by the governor to manage and oversee
the lottery and to appoint a director;
(2) "Commissioner", one of the members of the lottery
commission appointed by the governor pursuant to the
provisions of sections 313.200 to 313.350;
(3) "Director", the director of the state lottery
appointed by the commission as the chief administrator of
the state lottery;
(4) "Division", the division of the state lottery
authorized by sections 313.200 to 313.350;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 847 2
(5) "Lottery" or "state lottery", the state lottery
established and operated pursuant to the provisions of
sections 313.200 to 313.350;
(6) "Lottery contractor" or "lottery vendor", a person
with whom the division has contracted to provide goods or
services for the state lottery;
(7) "Lottery game" or "game", any procedure authorized
by written rule of the commission or by law whereby prizes
are distributed among persons who have paid, or have
unconditionally agreed to pay, for tickets or shares in
either a physical or electronic format which provide the
opportunity to win such prizes;
(8) "Lottery game retailer", any person with whom the
lottery commission has contracted to sell tickets or shares
in lottery games to the public;
(9) "Lottery ticket" or "shares", any bearer
instrument in a physical form or in an electronic format
authorized by the commission. A bearer instrument may
include credits that can be redeemed for use in playing
future lottery games;
(10) "Person", any natural person, firm, corporation,
or other legal entity possessing a department of revenue
retail sales license, as provided by law.
313.230. The commission shall:
(1) Issue rules and regulations concerning the
operation of the Missouri state lottery. The rules and
regulations shall include, but shall not be limited to, the
following:
(a) The type of lottery to be conducted, except no
lottery may use any coin- or token-operated amusement device
[and no]. Lottery [game shall] games may be based [in any
form] on the outcome of sporting events where the maximum

SB 847 3
ticket price does not exceed five dollars per ticket.
[However,] It shall be legal to use clerk- or player-
activated terminals or kiosks[, which are coin- or currency-
operated,] to [dispense] sell lottery tickets. The
commission may also use an internet application to sell
electronic scratcher games, draw games, and pull-tab games
where a player may access such internet application to buy
lottery tickets in an electronic format using a personal
device;
(b) The price, or prices, of tickets or shares in the
lottery;
(c) The numbers and sizes of the prizes on the winning
tickets or shares;
(d) The manner of selecting the winning tickets or
shares;
(e) The manner of payment of prizes to the holders of
winning tickets or shares;
(f) The frequency of the drawings or selections of
winning tickets or shares, without limitation;
(g) The types or numbers of locations at which tickets
or shares may be sold and the method to be used in selling
tickets or shares;
(h) The method to be used in selling tickets or shares;
(i) The licensing of lottery game retailers to sell
tickets or shares;
(j) The manner and amount of compensation, including
commissions, ticket discounts, incentives and any other
remuneration, to be paid to or retained by lottery game
retailers;
(k) The apportionment of the total revenues accruing
from the sale of lottery tickets or shares and from all
other sources among:

SB 847 4
a. The payment of prizes to the holders of winning
tickets or shares;
b. The payment of costs incurred in the operation and
administration of the lottery, including the expenses of the
commission and the costs resulting from any contract or
contracts entered into for promotional, advertising or
operational services or for the purchase or lease of lottery
equipment and materials;
c. For the repayment to the general revenue fund of
any amount appropriated for initial start-up of the lottery;
and
d. For timely transfer to the state lottery fund as
provided by law;
(l) Such other matters necessary or desirable for the
efficient and economical operation and administration of the
lottery and for the convenience of the purchasers of tickets
or shares and the holders of winning tickets or shares. The
commission may disburse money for payment of lottery prizes;
(2) Amend, repeal, or supplement any such rules and
regulations from time to time as it deems necessary or
desirable;
(3) Advise and make recommendations to the director
regarding the operation and administration of the lottery;
(4) Report quarterly to the governor and the general
assembly the total lottery revenues, prize disbursements and
other expenses for the preceding quarter, and to make an
annual report, which shall include a full and complete
statement of lottery revenues, prize disbursements and other
expenses, to the governor and the general assembly, and
including such recommendations for changes in sections
313.200 to 313.350 as it deems necessary or desirable;

SB 847 5
(5) Report to the governor and general assembly any
matters which shall require immediate changes in the laws of
this state in order to prevent abuses and evasions of
sections 313.200 to 313.350 or rules and regulations
promulgated thereunder or to rectify undesirable conditions
in connection with the administration or operation of the
lottery;
(6) Carry on a continuous study and investigation of
the lottery throughout the state and to make a continuous
study and investigation of the operation and the
administration of similar laws which may be in effect in
other states or countries, any literature on the subject
which from time to time may be published or available, any
federal laws which may affect the operation of the lottery,
and the reaction of Missouri citizens to existing and
potential features of the lottery with a view to
recommending or effecting changes that will tend to serve
the purposes of sections 313.200 to 313.350;
(7) Ensure that all employees of the state lottery
commission hired after July 12, 1990, shall not be related
to any member of the state lottery commission or any
employee of the state lottery commission within the third
degree of consanguinity or affinity.
✓